Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-228
Action by victim of sexual assault of a child; when.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) There shall not be any time limitation for an action against the individual or individuals directly causing an injury or injuries suffered by a plaintiff when the plaintiff was a victim of a violation of section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 if such violation occurred (i) on or after August 24, 2017, or (ii) prior to August 24, 2017, if such action was not previously time barred; and

(b) An action against any person or entity other than the individual directly causing an injury or injuries suffered by a plaintiff when the plaintiff was a victim of a violation of section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 may only be brought within twelve years after the plaintiff's twenty-first birthday.

(2) Criminal prosecution of a defendant under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 is not required to maintain a civil action for violation of such sections.

Laws 2012, LB612, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB300, § 1.

This section does not apply to an action that was already barred under the existing statutes of limitations at the time this section was enacted in 2012. Doe v. McCoy, 297 Neb. 321, 899 N.W.2d 899 (2017).